Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7401
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-7401 to 44-7410 shall be known and may be cited as the Unfair Discrimination Against Subjects of Abuse in Insurance Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1035, § 14.